Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2262.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 626, 629, 912.1, 912.2(a), 913 heading, (b.1), (b.2) and (c) and 951(b) of the act of June 3, 1937 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 626. Special Elections for United States Senator; Nominations.--Whenever a vacancy shall occur in the office of United States Senator, said vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the vote of the electors of the State at a special election to be held at the time of the next general or municipal election, occurring at least ninety (90) days after the happening of such vacancy, and it shall be the duty of the Governor to issue writs of election to the various county boards of elections and to the Secretary of the Commonwealth within ten (10) days after the happening of said vacancy. Candidates to fill vacancies in the office of United States Senator shall be nominated by political parties, in accordance with the party rules relating to the filling of vacancies, by means of nomination certificates, in the form prescribed in section 630 of this act; and by political bodies, by means of nomination papers, in accordance with the provisions of sections [951, 952 and 954] 951 and 952 of this act. Said nomination certificates and nomination papers shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of the Commonwealth at least sixty (60) days prior to the date of said special election. Until such time as said vacancy shall be filled by an election as herein provided, the Governor of the Commonwealth may make a temporary appointment to fill said vacancy.Section 629. Nominations for Special Election for Representative in Congress, Senator and Representative in the General Assembly and Member of Council or Legislative Body of Cities, Boroughs, Towns and Townships.--Candidates to fill vacancies in the offices of Representative in Congress, Senator 20260HB2262PN2960 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Representative in the General Assembly and member of the council or legislative body of any city, borough, town or township shall be nominated by political parties, in accordance with the party rules relating to the filling of vacancies, by means of nomination certificates, in the form prescribed in section 630 of this act; and by political bodies, by means of nomination papers, in accordance with the provisions of sections [951, 952 and 954] 951 and 952 of this act. Said nomination certificates and nomination papers for the office of Representative in Congress, Senator and Representative in the General Assembly shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of the Commonwealth not later than fifty (50) days prior to the date of the special election, and for the office of member of the council or legislative body of a city, borough, town or township, in the office of the county board of elections wherein such city, borough, town or township is situate, not later than fifteen (15) days after the issuance of the writ of election.Section 912.1. Number of Signers Required for Nomination Petitions of Candidates at Primaries.--Candidates for nomination of offices as listed below shall present a nominating petition containing at least as many valid signatures of registered and enrolled members of the proper party as listed below:(1) President of the United States: [Two] One thousand.(2) United States Senate: [Two] One thousand.(3) Governor: [Two] One thousand including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least ten counties.(4) Lieutenant Governor: [One thousand] Five hundred including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(5) Treasurer: [One thousand] Five hundred including at 20260HB2262PN2960 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(6) Auditor General: [One thousand] Five hundred including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(7) Attorney General: [One thousand] Five hundred including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(8) Justice of the Supreme Court: [One thousand] Five hundred including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(9) Judge of the Superior Court: [One thousand] Five hundred including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(10) Judge of the Commonwealth Court: [One thousand] Five hundred including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(11) For any other office to be filled by the vote of the electors of the State at large or for any other party office to be elected by the electors of the State at large: [One thousand] Five hundred including at least [one hundred] fifty from each of at least five counties.(12) Representative in Congress: [One thousand] Five hundred.(13) Senator in the General Assembly: [Five hundred] Two hundred fifty.(14) Representative in the General Assembly: [Three hundred] One hundred fifty.(15) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the first class at large: [One thousand] Five hundred.20260HB2262PN2960 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (16) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the second class at large: [Five hundred] Two hundred fifty.(17) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in cities of the first class at large: [One thousand] Five hundred.(18) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the second class A at large: [Two hundred fifty] One hundred twenty-five.(19) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the third class at large: [Two hundred fifty] One hundred twenty-five.(20) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the fourth class at large: [Two hundred fifty] One hundred twenty-five.(21) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in cities of the second class at large: [Two hundred fifty] One hundred twenty-five.(22) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in cities of the second class A at large: [One hundred] Fifty.(23) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in cities of the third class at large: [One hundred] Fifty.(24) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the fifth class at large: [One hundred] Fifty.(25) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the sixth class at large: [One hundred] Fifty.20260HB2262PN2960 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (26) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the seventh class at large: [One hundred] Fifty.(27) Public or party offices to be filled by a vote of the electors in counties of the eighth class at large: [One hundred] Fifty.(28) Office of judge of any court of record other than a Statewide court or a court in a county of the first or second class: [Two hundred fifty] One hundred twenty-five.(29) District delegate or alternate district delegate to a National party convention: [Two hundred fifty] One hundred twenty-five.(30) Member of State committee: [One hundred] Fifty.(31) Office of district council member in a city of the first class: [Seven hundred fifty] Three hundred seventy-five.(31.1) Office of district council member in a city of the second class: [One hundred] Fifty.(32) Office of magisterial district judge: [One hundred] Fifty, but only for a candidate's primary election when the candidate does not already hold the office of magisterial district judge. A sitting magisterial district judge elected to the office shall not be required to file a nominating petition under this section to run for the office of magisterial district judge but may instead file a certificate of nomination for reelection specifying the intent to seek reelection to the office. If a sitting magisterial district judge files a certificate of nomination for reelection, the sitting magisterial district judge may not challenge the nominating petition of another candidate for magisterial district judge.(33) Office of judge of election: [Ten] Five.20260HB2262PN2960 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (34) Inspector of elections: [Five] Three.(35) School director: [Ten] Five.(36) All other public and party offices: [Ten] Five.Section 912.2. Nominations by Minor Political Parties.--(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this act to the contrary, minor political parties shall nominate all of their candidates for the offices to be filled at the ensuing November election pursuant to section 903 in accordance with the requirements of section 951, other than subsection (e)(6) and (7) thereof, [and section 954,] and shall obtain the required signatures during the same time frame available to political bodies. Minor political parties shall be subject to the provisions of this act applicable to political parties with respect to special elections, voter registration forms, substituted nominations and all other purposes except as otherwise expressly provided in this section. "Minor political party" shall mean a political party as defined in section 801(a) or (b) whose State-wide registration is less than fifteen per centum of the combined State-wide registration for all State-wide political parties as of the close of the registration period immediately preceding the most recent November election. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall prescribe forms or, if there is insufficient time, make appropriate conforming changes in existing forms to carry out the purposes of this section.* * *Section 913. Place and Time of Filing Nomination Petitions[; Filing Fees].--* * *[(b.1) Each person filing any nomination petition shall pay for each petition, at the time of filing, a filing fee to be determined as follows, and no nomination petition shall be 20260HB2262PN2960 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accepted or filed, unless and until such filing fee is paid by a certified check or money order or also by cash when filed with the county board. All moneys paid on account of filing fees shall be transmitted by the county board to the county treasurer and shall become part of the General Fund. Certified checks or money orders in payment of filing fees shall be made payable to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or to the county, as the case may be, and shall be transmitted to the State Treasurer or to the county treasurer and shall become part of the General Fund.1. If for the office of President of the United States, or for any public office to be filled by the electors of the State at large, the sum of two hundred dollars ($200.00).2. If for the office of Representative in Congress, the sum of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00).3. If for the office of judge of a court of record, excepting judges to be voted for by the electors of the State at large, the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00).4. If for the offices of Senator or Representative in the General Assembly, for any office to be filled by the electors of an entire county, for the office of district councilman in a city of the first class and for any office other than school district office to be filled by the electors of an entire city, the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00), except as provided in paragraph 4.1.4.1. If for nonschool board offices for any third class city official, the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).6. If for the office of delegate or alternate delegate to National party convention, or member of National committee or member of State committee, the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).20260HB2262PN2960 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7. If for the office of constable, the sum of ten dollars ($10.00).8. If for the office of district councilman in a city of the second class or the office of district justice, the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00).(b.2) A filing fee shall not be paid for a nomination petition for any public office for which no compensation is provided by law, nor for any nomination petition for any public officer in any borough, town or township nor any party officer except as provided above nor for any nomination petition for judge of election or inspector of elections.(c) The filing fees herein provided for shall not be refunded in the event of the withdrawal of any candidate named in any petition, or for any other cause whatsoever.]* * *Section 951. Nominations by Political Bodies.--* * *[(b) Where the nomination is for any office to be filled by the electors of the State at large, the number of qualified electors of the State signing such nomination paper shall be at least equal to two per centum of the largest entire vote cast for any elected candidate in the State at large at the last preceding election at which State-wide candidates were voted for. In the case of all other nominations, the number of qualified electors of the electoral district signing such nomination papers shall be at least equal to two per centum of the largest entire vote cast for any officer, except a judge of a court of record, elected at the last preceding election in said electoral district for which said nomination papers are to be filed, and shall be not less than the number of signers required for nomination petitions for party candidates for the 20260HB2262PN2960 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 same office. In cases where a new electoral district shall have been created, the number of qualified electors signing such nomination papers, for candidates to be elected at the first election held after the creation of such district, shall be at least equal to two per centum of the largest vote cast in the several election districts, which are included in the district newly created, for any officer elected in the last preceding election.]* * *Section 2. Section 954 of the act is repealed:[Section 954. Filing Fee.--The same filing fee shall be paid for each candidate nominated by a nomination paper as required in section 913 for the filing of nomination petitions by candidates for nomination to the same office. Each nomination paper nominating a candidate or a group of candidates for office shall be accompanied by a certified check or money order drawn in the proper amount to cover the filing fees for each candidate nominated therein but in no case less than the sum of five dollars ($5.00), and payable to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or to the county, as the case may be. All fees so received by the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county election board shall be transmitted to the State Treasurer or to the county treasurer, as the case may be, and shall become part of the General Fund.]Section 3. Sections 976 and 978.1 of the act are amended to read:Section 976. Examination of Nomination Petitions, Certificates and Papers; Return of Rejected Nomination Petitions, Certificates and Papers.--When any nomination petition, nomination certificate or nomination paper is 20260HB2262PN2960 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 presented in the office of the Secretary of the Commonwealth or of any county board of elections for filing within the period limited by this act, it shall be the duty of the said officer or board to examine the same. No nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate shall be permitted to be filed if--(a) it contains material errors or defects apparent on the face thereof, or on the face of the appended or accompanying affidavits; or (b) it contains material alterations made after signing without the consent of the signers; or (c) it does not contain a sufficient number of signatures as required by law; Provided, however, That the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections, although not hereby required so to do, may question the genuineness of any signature or signatures appearing thereon, and if he or it shall thereupon find that any such signature or signatures are not genuine, such signature or signatures shall be disregarded in determining whether the nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate contains a sufficient number of signatures as required by law; or (d) in the case of nomination petitions, if nomination petitions have been filed for printing the name of the same person for the same office, except the office of judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or the office of school director in districts where that office is elective or the office of justice of the peace upon the official ballot of more than one political party; or (e) in the case of nomination papers, if the candidate named therein has filed a nomination petition for any public office for the ensuing primary, or has been nominated for any such office by nomination papers previously filed; [or (f) if the nomination petitions or papers are not accompanied by the filing fee or certified check 20260HB2262PN2960 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required for said office;] or (g) in the case of nomination papers, the appellation set forth therein is identical with or deceptively similar to the words used by any existing party or by any political body which has already filed nomination papers for the same office, or if the appellation set forth therein contains part of the name, or an abbreviation of the name or part of the name of an existing political party, or of a political body which has already filed nomination papers for the same office. The invalidity of any sheet of a nomination petition or nomination paper shall not affect the validity of such petition or paper if a sufficient petition or paper remains after eliminating such invalid sheet. The action of said officer or board in refusing to receive and file any such nomination petition, certificate or paper, may be reviewed by the court upon an application to compel its reception as of the date when it was presented to the office of such officer or board: Provided, however, That said officer or board shall be entitled to a reasonable time in which to examine any petitions, certificates or papers, and to summon and interrogate the candidates named therein, or the persons presenting said petitions, certificates or papers, and his or their retention of same for the purpose of making such examination or interrogation shall not be construed as an acceptance or filing.Upon completion of any examination, if any nomination petition, certificate or paper is found to be defective, it shall forthwith be rejected and returned to the candidate or one of the candidates named therein, together with a statement of the reasons for such rejection:Provided further, That no nomination petition, nomination paper or nomination certificate shall be permitted to be filed, 20260HB2262PN2960 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the political party or political body referred to therein shall be composed of a group of electors whose purposes or aims, or one of whose purposes or aims, is the establishment, control, conduct, seizure or overthrow of the Government of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or the United States of America by the use of force, violence, military measure or threats of one or more of the foregoing. The authority to reject such nomination petition, paper or certificate for this reason shall, when filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, be vested in a committee composed of the Governor, the Attorney General and the Secretary of the Commonwealth, and when filed with any county board of elections shall be vested in such board. If in such case the committee or board, as the case may be, shall conclude that the acceptance of such nomination petition, paper or certificate should be refused, it shall within two days of the filing of such nomination petition, paper or certificate fix a place and a time five days in advance for hearing the matter, and notice thereof shall be given to all parties affected thereby. At the time and place so fixed the committee or board, as the case may be, shall hear testimony, but shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence. The testimony presented shall be stenographically recorded and made a part of the record of the committee or board. Within two days after such hearing the committee or board, if satisfied upon competent evidence that the said nomination petition, paper or certificate is not entitled to be accepted and filed, it shall announce its decision and immediately notify the parties affected thereby. Failure to announce decision within two days after such hearing shall be conclusive that such nomination petition, paper or certificate has been accepted and filed. The decision of said 20260HB2262PN2960 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committee or board in refusing to accept and file such nomination petition, paper or certificate may be reviewed by the court upon an application to compel its reception as of the date when presented to the Secretary of the Commonwealth or such board. The application shall be made within two days of the time when such decision is announced. If the application is properly made, any judge of said court may fix a time and place for hearing the matter in dispute, of which notice shall be served with a copy of said application upon the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections, as the case may be. At the time so fixed, the court, or any judge thereof assigned for the purpose, shall hear the case de novo. If after such hearing the said court shall find that the decision of the committee or the board was erroneous, it shall issue its mandate to the committee or board to correct its decision and to accept and file the nomination paper, petition or certificate. From any decision of the court an appeal may be taken within two days after the entry thereof. It shall be the duty of the said court to fix the hearing and to announce its decision within such period of time as will permit the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of elections to permit the names of the candidates affected by the court's decision to be printed on the ballot, if the court should so determine.Section 978.1. Vacancy in Party Nomination [by Failure to Pay Filing Fee or] for Failure to File Loyalty Oath.--Every person nominated at any primary election as the candidate of any political party for any office, other than a borough, town, township, school district or poor district office, or the office of justice of the peace, or constable, [who has not paid the filing fee required by section nine hundred thirteen of this 20260HB2262PN2960 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act, as amended, for the filing of a nomination petition for such office, or] who has not filed the loyalty oath required by section 14, act of December 22, 1951 (P.L.1726), known as the "Pennsylvania Loyalty Act," as last amended June 19, 1961 (P.L.446), shall [pay the amount of such fee to and] file such oath with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, or the county board of elections, as the case may be, at least eighty-five (85) days previous to the day of the general or municipal election at which such candidate's name would appear on the ballot. Failure to [pay such fee or] file such oath within the time herein prescribed shall result in a vacancy in such party nomination. Such vacancy shall be filled in the manner hereinafter provided for the filling of such vacancies happening by reason of the death or withdrawal of any candidate.Section 4. The amendment or repeal of sections 626, 629, 912.1, 912.2(a), 913 heading, (b.1), (b.2) and (c), 951(b), 954, 976 and 978.1 of the act shall apply to the first primary election held after January 1, 2026, and each election held thereafter.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2262PN2960 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920